src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va ear éan/XxV1V2 ear
SFX Va eblar ébles/XxV7V8 eblar
SFX Va eblar ébla/XxV1V2 eblar
SFX Va eblar éblen/XxV1V2 eblar
SFX Va eblar éblan/XxV1V2 eblar
SFX Va ebrar ébres/XxV7V8 ebrar
SFX Va ebrar ébra/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Va ebrar ébren/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Va ebrar ébran/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Va ebriar ébries/XxV7V8 ebriar
SFX Va ebriar ébria/XxV1V2 ebriar
SFX Va ebriar ébrien/XxV1V2 ebriar
SFX Va ebriar ébrian/XxV1V2 ebriar
SFX Va ecar éques/XxV7V8 ecar
SFX Va ecar éca/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Va ecar équen/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Va ecar écan/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Va echar éches/XxV7V8 echar
SFX Va echar écha/XxV1V2 echar
SFX Va echar échen/XxV1V2 echar
SFX Va echar échan/XxV1V2 echar
SFX Va eciar écies/XxV7V8 eciar
SFX Va eciar écia/XxV1V2 eciar
SFX Va eciar écien/XxV1V2 eciar
SFX Va eciar écian/XxV1V2 eciar
SFX Va eclar écles/XxV7V8 eclar
SFX Va eclar écla/XxV1V2 eclar
SFX Va eclar éclen/XxV1V2 eclar
SFX Va eclar éclan/XxV1V2 eclar
SFX Va ecliar éclies/XxV7V8 ecliar
SFX Va ecliar éclia/XxV1V2 ecliar
SFX Va ecliar éclien/XxV1V2 ecliar
SFX Va ecliar éclian/XxV1V2 ecliar
SFX Va ecriar écries/XxV7V8 ecriar
SFX Va ecriar écria/XxV1V2 ecriar
SFX Va ecriar écrien/XxV1V2 ecriar
SFX Va ecriar écrian/XxV1V2 ecriar
SFX Va ectar éctes/XxV7V8 ectar
SFX Va ectar écta/XxV1V2 ectar
SFX Va ectar écten/XxV1V2 ectar
SFX Va ectar éctan/XxV1V2 ectar
SFX Va edar édes/XxV7V8 edar
SFX Va edar éda/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Va edar éden/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Va edar édan/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Va ediar édies/XxV7V8 ediar
SFX Va ediar édia/XxV1V2 ediar
SFX Va ediar édien/XxV1V2 ediar
SFX Va ediar édian/XxV1V2 ediar
SFX Va edrar édres/XxV7V8 edrar
SFX Va edrar édra/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Va edrar édren/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Va edrar édran/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Va edriar édries/XxV7V8 edriar
SFX Va edriar édria/XxV1V2 edriar
SFX Va edriar édrien/XxV1V2 edriar
SFX Va edriar édrian/XxV1V2 edriar
SFX Va efrar éfres/XxV7V8 efrar
SFX Va efrar éfra/XxV1V2 efrar
SFX Va efrar éfren/XxV1V2 efrar
SFX Va efrar éfran/XxV1V2 efrar
SFX Va efriar éfries/XxV7V8 efriar
SFX Va efriar éfria/XxV1V2 efriar
SFX Va efriar éfrien/XxV1V2 efriar
SFX Va efriar éfrian/XxV1V2 efriar
SFX Va egar égues/XxV7V8 egar
SFX Va egar éga/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Va egar éguen/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Va egar égan/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Va eglar égles/XxV7V8 eglar
SFX Va eglar égla/XxV1V2 eglar
SFX Va eglar églen/XxV1V2 eglar
SFX Va eglar églan/XxV1V2 eglar
SFX Va egrar égres/XxV7V8 egrar
SFX Va egrar égra/XxV1V2 egrar
SFX Va egrar égren/XxV1V2 egrar
SFX Va egrar égran/XxV1V2 egrar
SFX Va eicar éiques/XxV7V8 eicar
SFX Va eicar éica/XxV1V2 eicar
SFX Va eicar éiquen/XxV1V2 eicar
SFX Va eicar éican/XxV1V2 eicar
SFX Va eigar éigues/XxV7V8 eigar
SFX Va eigar éiga/XxV1V2 eigar
SFX Va eigar éiguen/XxV1V2 eigar
SFX Va eigar éigan/XxV1V2 eigar
SFX Va eimar éimes/XxV7V8 eimar
SFX Va eimar éima/XxV1V2 eimar
SFX Va eimar éimen/XxV1V2 eimar
SFX Va eimar éiman/XxV1V2 eimar
SFX Va einar éines/XxV7V8 einar
SFX Va einar éina/XxV1V2 einar
SFX Va einar éinen/XxV1V2 einar
SFX Va einar éinan/XxV1V2 einar
SFX Va eipar éipes/XxV7V8 eipar
SFX Va eipar éipa/XxV1V2 eipar
SFX Va eipar éipen/XxV1V2 eipar
SFX Va eipar éipan/XxV1V2 eipar
SFX Va eirar éires/XxV7V8 eirar
SFX Va eirar éira/XxV1V2 eirar
SFX Va eirar éiren/XxV1V2 eirar
SFX Va eirar éiran/XxV1V2 eirar
SFX Va eisar éises/XxV7V8 eisar
SFX Va eisar éisa/XxV1V2 eisar
SFX Va eisar éisen/XxV1V2 eisar
SFX Va eisar éisan/XxV1V2 eisar
SFX Va eitar éites/XxV7V8 eitar
SFX Va eitar éita/XxV1V2 eitar
SFX Va eitar éiten/XxV1V2 eitar
SFX Va eitar éitan/XxV1V2 eitar
SFX Va eitiar éities/XxV7V8 eitiar
SFX Va eitiar éitia/XxV1V2 eitiar
SFX Va eitiar éitien/XxV1V2 eitiar
SFX Va eitiar éitian/XxV1V2 eitiar
SFX Va eizar éices/XxV7V8 eizar
SFX Va eizar éiza/XxV1V2 eizar
SFX Va eizar éicen/XxV1V2 eizar
SFX Va eizar éizan/XxV1V2 eizar
SFX Va elar éles/XxV7V8 elar
SFX Va elar éla/XxV1V2 elar
SFX Va elar élen/XxV1V2 elar
SFX Va elar élan/XxV1V2 elar
SFX Va eldar éldes/XxV7V8 eldar
SFX Va eldar élda/XxV1V2 eldar
SFX Va eldar élden/XxV1V2 eldar
SFX Va eldar éldan/XxV1V2 eldar
SFX Va eldrar éldres/XxV7V8 eldrar
SFX Va eldrar éldra/XxV1V2 eldrar
SFX Va eldrar éldren/XxV1V2 eldrar
SFX Va eldrar éldran/XxV1V2 eldrar
SFX Va elgar élgues/XxV7V8 elgar
SFX Va elgar élga/XxV1V2 elgar
SFX Va elgar élguen/XxV1V2 elgar
SFX Va elgar élgan/XxV1V2 elgar
SFX Va ellar élles/XxV7V8 ellar
SFX Va ellar élla/XxV1V2 ellar
SFX Va ellar éllen/XxV1V2 ellar
SFX Va ellar éllan/XxV1V2 ellar
SFX Va elpar élpes/XxV7V8 elpar
SFX Va elpar élpa/XxV1V2 elpar
SFX Va elpar élpen/XxV1V2 elpar
SFX Va elpar élpan/XxV1V2 elpar
SFX Va elsar élses/XxV7V8 elsar
SFX Va elsar élsa/XxV1V2 elsar
SFX Va elsar élsen/XxV1V2 elsar
SFX Va elsar élsan/XxV1V2 elsar
SFX Va eltrar éltres/XxV7V8 eltrar
SFX Va eltrar éltra/XxV1V2 eltrar
SFX Va eltrar éltren/XxV1V2 eltrar
SFX Va eltrar éltran/XxV1V2 eltrar
SFX Va emar émes/XxV7V8 emar
SFX Va emar éma/XxV1V2 emar
SFX Va emar émen/XxV1V2 emar
SFX Va emar éman/XxV1V2 emar
SFX Va emblar émbles/XxV7V8 emblar
SFX Va emblar émbla/XxV1V2 emblar
SFX Va emblar émblen/XxV1V2 emblar
SFX Va emblar émblan/XxV1V2 emblar
SFX Va embrar émbres/XxV7V8 embrar
SFX Va embrar émbra/XxV1V2 embrar
SFX Va embrar émbren/XxV1V2 embrar
SFX Va embrar émbran/XxV1V2 embrar
SFX Va emiar émies/XxV7V8 emiar
SFX Va emiar émia/XxV1V2 emiar
SFX Va emiar émien/XxV1V2 emiar
SFX Va emiar émian/XxV1V2 emiar
SFX Va empar émpes/XxV7V8 empar
SFX Va empar émpa/XxV1V2 empar
SFX Va empar émpen/XxV1V2 empar
SFX Va empar émpan/XxV1V2 empar
SFX Va empiar émpies/XxV7V8 empiar
SFX Va empiar émpia/XxV1V2 empiar
SFX Va empiar émpien/XxV1V2 empiar
SFX Va empiar émpian/XxV1V2 empiar
SFX Va emplar émples/XxV7V8 emplar
SFX Va emplar émpla/XxV1V2 emplar
SFX Va emplar émplen/XxV1V2 emplar
SFX Va emplar émplan/XxV1V2 emplar
SFX Va enar énes/XxV7V8 enar
SFX Va enar éna/XxV1V2 enar
SFX Va enar énen/XxV1V2 enar
SFX Va enar énan/XxV1V2 enar
SFX Va encar énques/XxV7V8 encar
SFX Va encar énca/XxV1V2 encar
SFX Va encar énquen/XxV1V2 encar
SFX Va encar éncan/XxV1V2 encar
SFX Va enchar énches/XxV7V8 enchar
SFX Va enchar éncha/XxV1V2 enchar
SFX Va enchar énchen/XxV1V2 enchar
SFX Va enchar énchan/XxV1V2 enchar
SFX Va enciar éncies/XxV7V8 enciar
SFX Va enciar éncia/XxV1V2 enciar
SFX Va enciar éncien/XxV1V2 enciar
SFX Va enciar éncian/XxV1V2 enciar
SFX Va endar éndes/XxV7V8 endar
SFX Va endar énda/XxV1V2 endar
SFX Va endar énden/XxV1V2 endar
SFX Va endar éndan/XxV1V2 endar
SFX Va endiar éndies/XxV7V8 endiar
SFX Va endiar éndia/XxV1V2 endiar
SFX Va endiar éndien/XxV1V2 endiar
SFX Va endiar éndian/XxV1V2 endiar
SFX Va endrar éndres/XxV7V8 endrar
SFX Va endrar éndra/XxV1V2 endrar
SFX Va endrar éndren/XxV1V2 endrar
SFX Va endrar éndran/XxV1V2 endrar
SFX Va enfriar énfries/XxV7V8 enfriar
SFX Va enfriar énfria/XxV1V2 enfriar
SFX Va enfriar énfrien/XxV1V2 enfriar
SFX Va enfriar énfrian/XxV1V2 enfriar
SFX Va engar éngues/XxV7V8 engar
SFX Va engar énga/XxV1V2 engar
SFX Va engar énguen/XxV1V2 engar
SFX Va engar éngan/XxV1V2 engar
SFX Va enguar éngües/XxV7V8 enguar
SFX Va enguar éngua/XxV1V2 enguar
SFX Va enguar éngüen/XxV1V2 enguar
SFX Va enguar énguan/XxV1V2 enguar
SFX Va eniar énies/XxV7V8 eniar
SFX Va eniar énia/XxV1V2 eniar
SFX Va eniar énien/XxV1V2 eniar
SFX Va eniar énian/XxV1V2 eniar
SFX Va enllar énlles/XxV7V8 enllar
SFX Va enllar énlla/XxV1V2 enllar
SFX Va enllar énllen/XxV1V2 enllar
SFX Va enllar énllan/XxV1V2 enllar
SFX Va enriar énries/XxV7V8 enriar
SFX Va enriar énria/XxV1V2 enriar
SFX Va enriar énrien/XxV1V2 enriar
SFX Va enriar énrian/XxV1V2 enriar
SFX Va ensar énses/XxV7V8 ensar
SFX Va ensar énsa/XxV1V2 ensar
SFX Va ensar énsen/XxV1V2 ensar
SFX Va ensar énsan/XxV1V2 ensar
SFX Va entar éntes/XxV7V8 entar
SFX Va entar énta/XxV1V2 entar
SFX Va entar énten/XxV1V2 entar
SFX Va entar éntan/XxV1V2 entar
SFX Va entiar énties/XxV7V8 entiar
SFX Va entiar éntia/XxV1V2 entiar
SFX Va entiar éntien/XxV1V2 entiar
SFX Va entiar éntian/XxV1V2 entiar
SFX Va entrar éntres/XxV7V8 entrar
SFX Va entrar éntra/XxV1V2 entrar
SFX Va entrar éntren/XxV1V2 entrar
SFX Va entrar éntran/XxV1V2 entrar
