src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abasnar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abisagrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aborbotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abueldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acalandrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acarapanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acañicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achigariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acobardar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acompañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acorriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acuartelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acutralar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adornar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afistular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afornar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afusticar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agromar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alboriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amacetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amayolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amontonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anacrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
antroidar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apartoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apernar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apitorrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arfiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arraserar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arremangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arroḥar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aseñaldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atesonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atosquecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añader/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
barbusar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
birllicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
burbixar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
caleriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
caramboliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cautivar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chapinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
choyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clavar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
comparar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
constatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
coroniellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cudiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
deducir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desabellugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desagrupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaporvolecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaxugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descreyer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenchufar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desensobiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
deshidratar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dexelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embromiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emparexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empimpollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaboxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encarbar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enchipar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encuadernar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfatizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engalurniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engrandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllastrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enrebollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ensugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entisnar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entriyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enxaular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbadellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbleznar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaciplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escanciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarpinterar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
eschaplazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escorchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esculapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfelpeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfrentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgañotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esllarigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmenuzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esnexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esparvatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esperiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espodrellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esrabetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esterruncar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrangular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estuntaniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
existir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ferraxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
forcadar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
garduñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gorgoxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
güexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inclinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inxeniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llapariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
lloquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maliciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
marondiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mermurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mosquerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
natar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ondular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
paluscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
paxinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pestañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
plantear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
premeditar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rampuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebater/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recomendar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
refocilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rematar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repolitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resplandir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
revilgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
roblar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sagramentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
serpollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sofexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sorrayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
surtir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tarmiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tingalexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trabiscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tresformar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trufar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
valloriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vocerriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xingar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zambaliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ñesgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
